test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NI_C_makizin_gt-glossing.yaml
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gmakzinenyshiwaan
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+4: gmakzinensshinaanin
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gmakzinensshinaaning
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gmakzinensshinaanin
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+4: gmakzinensshiwaan
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gmakzinensshiwaang
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gmakzinensshiwaan
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+4: makzinenyshiwaan
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: makzinenyshiwaang
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: makzinenyshiwaan
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+4: makzinenyshinwan
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Loc: makzinenyshiniing
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Pl: makzinenyshinwan
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+4: makzinensshiwaan
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: makzinensshiwaang
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: makzinensshiwaan
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+4: makzinensshinwan
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Loc: makzinensshiniing
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Pl: makzinensshinwan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 6, 7
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+4: nmakzinenyshibniin
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: nmakzinenyshibniing
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: nmakzinenyshibniin
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: nmakzinensshibniin
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: nmakzinensshibniing
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: nmakzinensshibniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+4: gmakzinenyshibniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: gmakzinenyshibniing
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: gmakzinenyshibniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: gmakzinensshibniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: gmakzinensshibniing
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: gmakzinensshibniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+4: makzinenyshibniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: makzinenyshibniing
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: makzinenyshibniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: makzinensshibniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: makzinensshibniing
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: makzinensshibniin
     X+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+4: makzinenyshibniin
     X+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: makzinenyshibniing
     X+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: makzinenyshibniin
     X+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: makzinensshibniin
     X+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: makzinensshibniing
     X+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: makzinensshibniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 6, 7
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmakzinenynaanbaniin
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmakzinenynaanbaniing
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmakzinenynaanbaniin
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmakzinensnaanbaniin
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmakzinensnaanbaniing
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmakzinensnaanbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmakzinenynaanbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakzinenynaanbaniing
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakzinenynaanbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmakzinenywaabniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakzinenywaabniing
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakzinenywaabniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmakzinensnaanbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakzinensnaanbaniing
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakzinensnaanbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmakzinenswaabniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakzinenswaabniing
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakzinenswaabniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt+4: makzinenywaabniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: makzinenywaabniing
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: makzinenywaabniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+3+4+Prt+4: makzinenyniwbaniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+3+4+Prt+Loc: makzinenyniwbaniing
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+3+4+Prt+Pl: makzinenyniwbaniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+4: makzinenswaabniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: makzinenswaabniing
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: makzinenswaabniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+3+4+Prt+4: makzinensniwbaniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+3+4+Prt+Loc: makzinensniwbaniing
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+3+4+Prt+Pl: makzinensniwbaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nmakzinmishnaanba
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmakzinmishnaandig
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gmakzinmishnaanba
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmakzinmishnaandig
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gmakzinmishwaaba
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmakzinmishwaadig
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: makzinmishwaaba
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: makzinmishwaadig
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: makzinmishniwba
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: makzinmishniwdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nmakzinmishnaanin
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nmakzinmishnaaning
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nmakzinmishnaanin
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gmakzinmishnaanin
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gmakzinmishnaaning
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gmakzinmishnaanin
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gmakzinmishwaan
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gmakzinmishwaang
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gmakzinmishwaan
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: makzinmishwaan
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: makzinmishwaang
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: makzinmishwaan
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: makzinmishniwan
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: makzinmishniing
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Pl: makzinmishniwan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: nmakzinmishbaniin
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: nmakzinmishbaniing
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: nmakzinmishbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gmakzinmishbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gmakzinmishbaniing
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gmakzinmishbaniin
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: makzinmishbaniin
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: makzinmishbaniing
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: makzinmishbaniin
     X+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: makzinmishbaniin
     X+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: makzinmishbaniing
     X+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: makzinmishbaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmakzinminaanbaniin
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmakzinminaanbaniing
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmakzinminaanbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmakzinminaanbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakzinminaanbaniing
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakzinminaanbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmakzinmiwaabniin
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakzinmiwaabniing
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakzinmiwaabniin
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: makzinmiwaabniin
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: makzinmiwaabniing
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: makzinmiwaabniin
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: makzinminwibniin
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: makzinminwibniing
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Pl: makzinminwibniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+mkizin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmakzin'shinaanbaniin
     1+mkizin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmakzin'shinaanbaniing
     1+mkizin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmakzin'shinaanbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmakzin'shinaanbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakzin'shinaanbaniing
     2+mkizin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakzin'shinaanbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmakzin'shiwaabniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakzin'shiwaabniing
     2+mkizin+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakzin'shiwaabniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: makzin'shiwaabniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: makzin'shiwaabniing
     3+mkizin+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: makzin'shiwaabniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: makzin'shinwibniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: makzin'shinwibniing
     3+mkizin+NI+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: makzin'shinwibniin
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nmakzinenymishnaanba
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmakzinenymishnaandig
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nmakzinensmishnaanba
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmakzinensmishnaandig
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gmakzinenymishnaanba
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmakzinenymishnaandig
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gmakzinenymishwaaba
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmakzinenymishwaadig
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gmakzinensmishnaanba
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmakzinensmishnaandig
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gmakzinensmishwaaba
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmakzinensmishwaadig
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: makzinenymishwaaba
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: makzinenymishwaadig
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: makzinenymishniwba
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: makzinenymishniwdig
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: makzinensmishwaaba
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: makzinensmishwaadig
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: makzinensmishniwba
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: makzinensmishniwdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nmakzinenymishnaanin
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nmakzinenymishnaaning
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nmakzinenymishnaanin
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nmakzinensmishnaanin
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nmakzinensmishnaaning
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nmakzinensmishnaanin
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gmakzinenymishnaanin
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gmakzinenymishnaaning
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gmakzinenymishnaanin
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gmakzinenymishwaan
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gmakzinenymishwaang
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gmakzinenymishwaan
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gmakzinensmishnaanin
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gmakzinensmishnaaning
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gmakzinensmishnaanin
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gmakzinensmishwaan
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gmakzinensmishwaang
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gmakzinensmishwaan
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: makzinenymishwaan
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: makzinenymishwaang
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: makzinenymishwaan
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: makzinenymishniwan
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: makzinenymishniing
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Pl: makzinenymishniwan
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: makzinensmishwaan
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: makzinensmishwaang
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: makzinensmishwaan
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: makzinensmishniwan
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: makzinensmishniing
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Pl: makzinensmishniwan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: nmakzinenymishbaniin
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: nmakzinenymishbaniing
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: nmakzinenymishbaniin
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: nmakzinensmishbaniin
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: nmakzinensmishbaniing
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: nmakzinensmishbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gmakzinenymishbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gmakzinenymishbaniing
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gmakzinenymishbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gmakzinensmishbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gmakzinensmishbaniing
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gmakzinensmishbaniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: makzinenymishbaniin
